apertium-kir.kir.lexc
LEXICON N1-ABBR

%<n%>%<attr%>: ATTR ;
%<n%>:%- POSSESSION ;
%<n%>%<gen%>:%-%>нын # ;  ! FIXME: needs rules and all

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON

POSSESSION ;

LEXICON PLURAL  !! ADDED FMT 2014-08-18

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ; !! ADDED FMT 2014-08-18
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ; !! ADDED FMT 2014-08-18
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р ABESSIVE-SUFFIX ; !! ADDED FMT 2014-08-18

LEXICON FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION !! ADDED FMT 2014-08-18

PLURAL ; !! ADDED FMT 2014-08-18
CASES ; !! ADDED FMT 2014-08-18
POSSESSION ; !! ADDED FMT 2014-08-18
ABESSIVE-SUFFIX ; !! ADDED FMT 2014-08-18
LUU-SUFFIX ; !! ADDED FMT 2014-08-18

LEXICON N-INFL-SG  ! nouns with no/irregular plural

!%<n%>: N-INFL-COMMON ;
!%<n%>%<attr%>:%>%{L%}%{U%}%{U%} ATTR ;

%<n%>%<attr%>: ATTR ;
%<n%>: POSSESSION ;
%<n%>: CASES ;
%<n%>: ABESSIVE-SUFFIX ;
%<n%>: LUU-SUFFIX ;

LEXICON N-INFL-PL  ! for irregular plurals

%<n%>%<pl%>: POSSESSION ;
%<n%>%<pl%>: CASES ;
%<n%>%<pl%>: ABESSIVE-SUFFIX ;
%<n%>%<pl%>: LUU-SUFFIX ;

LEXICON N1  ! FIXME

N-INFL ; 

LEXICON N6

:%{і%} N1 ; 
N1 ;  ! Dir/LR     ! We want to analyse forms without %{і%}, since they're used
                   ! but "properly" we want to generate forms with %{і%}

LEXICON N-INFL      ! Nouns that have a LUU attributive form

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

!%<n%>: SUBST-COMMON ;
!%<n%>%<attr%>: ATTR ;
!%<n%>%<attr%>:%>%{L%}%{U%}%{U%} ATTR ;

LEXICON N-INFL-KI   ! Nouns that have a KI attributive form

%<n%>: KI ;
%<n%>: SUBST-COMMON ;

! LEXICON N-INFL-NO-ATTR  ! Used for nouns that have irregular <attr> forms
! 
! %<n%>: SUBST-COMMON ;
! 
! LEXICON N-INFL-JUST-KI  ! Used for nouns that have irregular KI forms
! 
! %<n%>: KI ;

LEXICON N-INFL-NKI

%<n%>:%{I%}н KI ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>:%{I%}ң KI ; 
%<n%>: SUBST-COMMON ;

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON

:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} GEN-POS ;
POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;  ! for stuff like "биздин аба ырайыбыз" and even "анын аба ырайы",
                      ! which should have a <px3sp> analysis


LEXICON N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND

%<n%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} GEN-POS ;

LEXICON GER-INFL

POSSESSION ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;
ABESSIVE-SUFFIX ;

LEXICON NP-ORG-COMPOUND

%<np%>%<org%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;

LEXICON ADV-LANG

N-INFL ;
ADV ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-ASSR

%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

%<np%>%<top%>: POSSESSION ; 
%<np%>%<top%>:%- POSSESSION ;  ! Dir/LR  Generate without dash, but allow analysis of forms with dash

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

! %<adj%>%<top%>:%>%{L%}%{I%}к ADJ-COMMON ; ! FIXME: do these tags make sense?

LEXICON NP-TOP-CLUSTER

:%{і%} NP-TOP ; 
NP-TOP ;  ! Dir/LR ! We want to analyse forms without %{і%}, since they're used
                   ! but "properly" we want to generate forms with %{і%}

LEXICON NP-TOP-ABBR

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

%<np%>%<top%>%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<top%>:%- NP-COMMON ;             ! Dir/LR   ! also allow like this to be parsed, but generate without -


LEXICON NP-COMMON
! N-INFL-COMMON ;
FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ; 

LEXICON NP-COG-COMMON

%<attr%>: # ;
NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-IN

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COG-COMMON ; ! FIXME
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:а NP-COG-COMMON ; ! FIXME

LEXICON NP-COG-OB

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COG-COMMON ; ! FIXME
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:а NP-COG-COMMON ; ! FIXME

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: NP-COG-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-M

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COG-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-F

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>: NP-COG-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-MF

NP-ANT-M ; 
NP-ANT-F ; 

LEXICON NP-PAT-VICH

! For patronyms ending with -вич
! Their feminine equivalets end with -вна /I.S./

%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>:вич NP-COMMON ;

%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>:вна NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>: N-INFL-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<org%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-ORG-LAT

%<np%>%<org%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<org%>: N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<org%>:%- N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
! This one doesn't work right because of twol:
!%<np%>%<org%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<org%>%<attr%>: # ;


LEXICON NP-TOP-COMPOUND

! FIXME:
!%<np%>%<top%>%<nom%>: # ;
!%<np%>%<top%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;
!%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

!probably bad:
!%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ;
!%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

%<np%>%<top%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} # ;


!! LEXICON NP-TOP-ACR
!! 
!! %<np%>%<top%>: POSSESSION ;
!! %<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NAT
! Nationalities

ADJ ;             ! nationality's adjectival form, e.g. "Turkish [food]"
N-INFL ;          ! a member of the nationality, e.g. "A Turk"
%>ч%{A%} ADV ;    ! as / in the style of the nat., e.g. "à la Turk"
%>ч%{A%} ADV ;    ! in the language of the nationality, e.g. "in Turkish"
%>ч%{A%} N-INFL ; ! the language of the nationality, e.g. "Turkish"

LEXICON NUM-COMMON

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<num%>%<ord%>: # ; 

LEXICON NUM

NUM-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} # ;             ! FIXME: base form, <det> reading
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} SUBST-COMMON ; ! Added <subst>

LEXICON NUM-ITG

%<num%>%<itg%>: # ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<subst%>: N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;


LEXICON NP-AL-PL

%<np%>%<al%>: POSSESSION ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>: POSSESSION ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON ADJ-LEVELS

! %<pst%>: # ;
# ;
%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{A%}к CLIT ;
%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}к CLIT ;        ! Dir/LR

LEXICON A1

%<adj%>: PRED ;                                       !# жақсы адам
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{A%}к PRED ;            !# жақсырақ іс
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}к PRED ;                 ! Dir/LR

%<adj%>%<sup%>%[%+red%]: PRED ;

%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;                             !# жақсыны таптым
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{A%}к SUBST ;  !# жақсырақты таптым
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}к SUBST ;       ! Dir/LR

%<adj%>%<advl%>: CLIT ;                               !# жақсы білемін
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<advl%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{A%}к CLIT ;    !# "...ион көп болса соғұрлым тоқ жақсырақ өтеді."
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<advl%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}к CLIT ;         ! Dir/LR

LEXICON A2                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without adverbial reading;
                           ! <adj> and <adj.subst> readings have comparison levels.
                           !# татыктуу

%<adj%>: PRED ;                                       !# татыктуу адам
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{A%}к PRED ;            !# татыктуураак ага караганда
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}к PRED ;                 ! Dir/LR

%<adj%>%<sup%>%[%+red%]: PRED ;

%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;                             !# чыныгы наамга татыктууну издейли
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{A%}к SUBST ;  !# "пайгамбардын биринчи ордун басуучулук милдетине барынан татыктуураагы Абу Бакр (р.а.) экендигин билдиришет."
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}к SUBST ;       ! Dir/LR


LEXICON A3                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without adverbial reading,
                           ! so-called "predicatives" (бар, жок);
                           ! no comparison levels at all.
                           !# examples go here

%<adj%>: PRED ;                                       !# example 1
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;                             !# example 2
                                                      !# example 3

LEXICON Numerals 
тогуз:тогуз NUM ; ! "nine"
сексен:сексен NUM ; ! "eighty"
онтогуз:онтогуз NUM ; ! "nineteen"
V:V NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
IX:IX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVII:XVII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
нече:нече NUM-ITG ;
канча:канча NUM-ITG ;
LEXICON Nouns
аба% ырайы:аба% ырай N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND ; ! "weather"
бала:бала N-INFL-SG ; ! "child"
бала:балдар N-INFL-PL ; ! "children"
дайын:дайын N-INFL ;
диалект:диалект N6 ; 
дүйнөнүн% төрт% бурчу:дүйнөнүн% төрт% бурч N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND ; ! "the four corners of the world"   ! Use/MT
жер% алды:жер% алд N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND ;
комсомол:комсомол N-INFL ; 
контракт:контракт N6 ; 
пакт:пакт N6 ; 
пист:пист N-INFL ;
пункт:пункт N6 ; 
фасад:фасад N-INFL ; ! "" 
экинчи% күнү:экинчи% күнү N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND ; ! "Tuesday"
ДНК:ДНК%{а%} N1-ABBR ; ! "DNA"
ред%.:ред%.%{а%}%{й%} N1-ABBR ; ! "editor"
арамей:арамей N1 ; ! ""
бурят:бурят N1 ; ! ""
моңгол:монгол N1 ; ! "Mongol" ! Dir/LR
чех:чех N1 ; ! ""
испан:испан NAT ; ! "Spanish"
англис:англис NAT ; ! "English"
Ысрайыл:Ысрайыл NAT ; ! "Israeli"
жаз:жаз N-INFL-KI ; ! "spring"/"spring-time"
соң:соң N-INFL-KI ; ! "end"/"final"
сырт:сырт N-INFL-KI ; ! "outside"/"outer"
төмөн:төмөн N-INFL-KI ; ! "bottom"/"following/below"
арт:арт N-INFL-NKI ; ! "back, behind", "rear"
аст:аст N-INFL-NKI ; ! "bottom", "lower"
аст:ас%{т%} N-INFL-NKI ; ! "bottom; underneath, below"
үст:үст N-INFL-NKI ; ! "top", "upper"
LEXICON ProperNouns
Бамако:Бамако NP-TOP ; ! ""
ВДР:ВДР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! "Vietnam Democratic Republic"
Донецк:Донецк NP-TOP-CLUSTER ;
ЕБ:ЕБ%{э%} NP-TOP-COMPOUND ; ! "European Union"
Италия:Италия NP-TOP ; ! "Italy"
Каракалпак% АССР:Каракалпак% АССР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Кыргыз% ССР:Кыргыз% ССР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ASSR ;
Кыргыз% Республикасы:Кыргыз% Республика NP-TOP-COMPOUND ; ! "Kyrgyz Republic"
Нью-Дели:Нью% Дели NP-TOP ; ! Dir/LR
Татар% АССР:Татар% АССР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Украина% ССР:Украина% ССР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Хорватия:Хорватия NP-TOP ; ! ""
Уральск:Уральск NP-TOP-CLUSTER ; ! "Uralsk"
Семей:Семипалатинск NP-TOP-CLUSTER ; ! "Semipalatinsk"  ! Dir/LR
Тобольск:Тобольск NP-TOP-CLUSTER ; ! ""
Советтер% Союзу:Советтер% Союз NP-TOP-COMPOUND ; ! "Soviet Union"
Investment:Investment NP-ORG ; ! ""
Блумберг:Блумберг NP-ORG ; ! ""
Twitter:Twitter NP-ORG-LAT ; ! ""
YouTube:YouTube NP-ORG-LAT ; ! ""
Getty% Images:Getty% Images%{э%}%{з%} NP-ORG-LAT ; ! ""
Mobil:Mobil NP-AL ; ! ""
Евро:Евро NP-AL ; ! "European Championship"
Совет:Совет NP-AL-PL ; ! ""
Жетиген:Жетиген NP-AL ; ! "The Big Dipper"
Кыргызокуупедмамбас:Кыргызокуупедмамбас NP-ORG ; ! "Kyrgyz Pedagogical State Press"
Түрк% Аба% Жолдору:Түрк% Аба% Жолдор NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; ! "Turkish Airlines"
Чемпиондор% лигасы:Чемпиондор% лига NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; ! "UEFA Champions League"
Илим% Академиясы:Илим% Академия NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; ! "Academy of Sciences"
Аселхан:Аселхан NP-ANT-F ; ! "Äselxan" 
Бекберген:Бекберген NP-ANT-M ; ! "Bekbergen" (Kazakh)
Дениз:Дениз NP-ANT-MF ; ! "Deniz" (Turkish)
Дилбара:Дилбара NP-ANT-F ; ! "Dilbara" (Persian)
Жексен:Жексен NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Рабига:Рабига NP-ANT-F ; ! "Räbiyğa" (Arabic)
Тауекел:Тауекел NP-ANT-M ; ! "Täwekel" (Kazakh)
Чжин:Чжин NP-ANT-MF ; ! ""
Иванович:Ивано NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Павлович:Павло NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Янукович:Януко NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Клоп:Клоп NP-COG-M ; ! "Klopp (German surname)"
Меркель:Меркель NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Байтурсынулы:Байтурсынулы NP-COG-M ; ! "" Kazakh family name
Далбагаев:Далбагаев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Ильин:Ильин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Кулов:Кулов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Лапин:Лапин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Сорокин:Сорокин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Кадыров:Кадыров NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Владимир:Владимир NP-COG-M ;
Орузбаева:Орузбаева NP-COG-F ;
Отунбаева:Отунбаева NP-COG-F ;
Бандич:Бандич NP-COG-MF ;
Эйүпович:Эйүпович NP-COG-MF ;
LEXICON Adjectives
асыл:асыл A3 ; ! "" 
императордук:императордук A3 ; ! "" 
чет% элдик:чет% элдик A3 ; ! "foreign" 
жат:жат A2 ; ! "" 
нымдуу:нымдуу A2 ; ! "have not seen the substantive form of this, so the nearest category is A2 because it has comp. form" 
жогору:жогору A1 ; ! "high" 
таза:таза A1 ; ! "clean" 
күроң:күроң A1 ; ! "FIXME no such adj" 
глобалдуу:глобалдуу A2 ; ! "global" ! FIXME: was MT-only, why?
LEXICON Adverbs
белорусча:белорусча ADV-LANG ; ! "" CHECK
еврейче:еврейче ADV-LANG ; ! "Jewish/Jew"
моңголчо:моңголчо ADV-LANG ; ! "Mongol"
фароэче:фароэче ADV-LANG ; ! ""
